Hawaii statutes.
§576B-613 Jurisdiction to modify
child support order of another state when individual parties reside in this
State. (a) If all of the parties who are individuals reside in this State
and the child does not reside in the issuing state, a tribunal of this State
has jurisdiction to enforce and to modify the issuing state's child support
order in a proceeding to register that order.

(b) A tribunal of this State exercising
jurisdiction under this section shall apply the provisions of Articles 1 and 2,
this article, and the procedural and substantive law of this State to the
proceeding for enforcement or modification. Articles 3, 4, 5, 7, and 8 shall
not apply. [L 1997, c 295, pt of §1; am L 2015, c 77, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next